North Carolina, session 2025, SB57.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 97-2(6) reads as rewritten:
"(6) Injury. – "Injury and personal injury" shall mean only injury by accident
arising out of and in the course of the employment, and shall not include a
disease in any form, except where it results naturally and unavoidably from
the accident. With respect to back injuries, however, where injury to the back
arises out of and in the course of the employment and is the direct result of a
specific traumatic incident of the work assigned, "injury by accident" shall be
construed to include any disabling physical injury to the back arising out of
and causally related to such incident. Injury shall include breakage or damage
to eyeglasses, hearing aids, dentures, or other prosthetic devices which
function as part of the body; provided, however, that eyeglasses and hearing
aids will not be replaced, repaired, or otherwise compensated for unless injury
to them is incidental to a compensable injury.body."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to claims for
workers' compensation benefits arising prior to, on, or after that date.
*S57-v-1*